Illinois, session 104th, SB3092.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 12-7.3 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/12-7.3)  (from Ch. 38, par. 12-7.3)7    Sec. 12-7.3. Stalking. 8    (a) A person commits stalking when he or she knowingly 9engages in a course of conduct directed at a specific person, 10and he or she knows or should know that this course of conduct 11would cause a reasonable person to:12        (1) fear for his or her safety or the safety of a third 13    person; or14        (2) suffer other emotional distress. 15    (a-3) A person commits stalking when he or she, knowingly 16and without lawful justification, on at least 2 separate 17occasions follows another person or places the person under 18surveillance or any combination thereof and:19        (1) at any time transmits a threat of immediate or 20    future bodily harm, sexual assault, confinement or 21    restraint and the threat is directed towards that person 22    or a family member of that person; or23        (2) places that person in reasonable apprehension of   SB3092- 2 -LRB104 18937 RLC 32382 b1    immediate or future bodily harm, sexual assault, 2    confinement or restraint to or of that person or a family 3    member of that person.4    (a-5) A person commits stalking when he or she has 5previously been convicted of stalking another person and 6knowingly and without lawful justification on one occasion:7        (1) follows that same person or places that same 8    person under surveillance; and9        (2) transmits a threat of immediate or future bodily 10    harm, sexual assault, confinement or restraint to that 11    person or a family member of that person.12    (a-7) A person commits stalking when he or she knowingly 13makes threats that are a part of a course of conduct and is 14aware of the threatening nature of his or her speech. 15    (a-10) A person commits stalking when he or she uses any 16electronic tracking system or acquires tracking information to 17determine the targeted person's location, movement, or travel 18patterns without the targeted person's consent and the person 19knows or should know that the use of the electronic tracking 20system or the acquisition of tracking information would cause 21a reasonable person to fear for his or her safety or the safety 22of a third person. 23    (b) Sentence. Stalking is a Class 4 felony; a second or 24subsequent conviction is a Class 3 felony.25    (c) Definitions. For purposes of this Section:26        (1) "Course of conduct" means 2 or more acts,   SB3092- 3 -LRB104 18937 RLC 32382 b1    including but not limited to acts in which a defendant 2    directly, indirectly, or through third parties, by any 3    action, method, device, or means follows, monitors, 4    observes, surveils, threatens, or communicates to or 5    about, a person, engages in other non-consensual contact, 6    or interferes with or damages a person's property or pet. 7    A course of conduct may include contact via electronic 8    communications.9        (2) "Electronic communication" means any transfer of 10    signs, signals, writings, sounds, data, or intelligence of 11    any nature transmitted in whole or in part by a wire, 12    radio, electromagnetic, photoelectric, or photo-optical 13    system. "Electronic communication" includes transmissions 14    by a computer through the Internet to another computer.15        (2.1) "Electronic tracking system" means a device 16    capable of emitting an electronic frequency or other 17    signal that may be used by a person to identify, monitor, 18    or record the location of another person or object. 19        (3) "Emotional distress" means significant mental 20    suffering, anxiety or alarm.21        (4) "Family member" means a parent, grandparent, 22    brother, sister, or child, whether by whole blood, 23    half-blood, or adoption and includes a step-grandparent, 24    step-parent, step-brother, step-sister or step-child. 25    "Family member" also means any other person who regularly 26    resides in the household, or who, within the prior 6   SB3092- 4 -LRB104 18937 RLC 32382 b1    months, regularly resided in the household. 2        (5) "Follows another person" means (i) to move in 3    relative proximity to a person as that person moves from 4    place to place or (ii) to remain in relative proximity to a 5    person who is stationary or whose movements are confined 6    to a small area. "Follows another person" does not include 7    a following within the residence of the defendant. 8        (6) "Non-consensual contact" means any contact with 9    the victim that is initiated or continued without the 10    victim's consent, including but not limited to being in 11    the physical presence of the victim; appearing within the 12    sight of the victim; approaching or confronting the victim 13    in a public place or on private property; appearing at the 14    workplace or residence of the victim; entering onto or 15    remaining on property owned, leased, or occupied by the 16    victim; or placing an object on, or delivering an object 17    to, property owned, leased, or occupied by the victim.18        (7) "Places a person under surveillance" means: (1) 19    remaining present outside the person's school, place of 20    employment, vehicle, other place occupied by the person, 21    or residence other than the residence of the defendant; or 22    (2) placing an electronic tracking device on the person or 23    the person's property. 24        (8) "Reasonable person" means a person in the victim's 25    situation.26        (9) "Transmits a threat" means a verbal or written   SB3092- 5 -LRB104 18937 RLC 32382 b1    threat or a threat implied by a pattern of conduct or a 2    combination of verbal or written statements or conduct. 3    (d) Exemptions.4        (1) This Section does not apply to any individual or 5    organization (i) monitoring or attentive to compliance 6    with public or worker safety laws, wage and hour 7    requirements, or other statutory requirements, or (ii) 8    picketing occurring at the workplace that is otherwise 9    lawful and arises out of a bona fide labor dispute, 10    including any controversy concerning wages, salaries, 11    hours, working conditions or benefits, including health 12    and welfare, sick leave, insurance, and pension or 13    retirement provisions, the making or maintaining of 14    collective bargaining agreements, and the terms to be 15    included in those agreements.16        (2) This Section does not apply to an exercise of the 17    right to free speech or assembly that is otherwise lawful.18        (3) Telecommunications carriers, commercial mobile 19    service providers, and providers of information services, 20    including, but not limited to, Internet service providers 21    and hosting service providers, are not liable under this 22    Section, except for willful and wanton misconduct, by 23    virtue of the transmission, storage, or caching of 24    electronic communications or messages of others or by 25    virtue of the provision of other related 26    telecommunications, commercial mobile services, or   SB3092- 6 -LRB104 18937 RLC 32382 b1    information services used by others in violation of this 2    Section. 3    (d-5) The incarceration of a person in a penal institution 4who commits the course of conduct or transmits a threat is not 5a bar to prosecution under this Section.6    (d-10) A defendant who directed the actions of a third 7party to violate this Section, under the principles of 8accountability set forth in Article 5 of this Code, is guilty 9of violating this Section as if the same had been personally 10done by the defendant, without regard to the mental state of 11the third party acting at the direction of the defendant. 12(Source: P.A. 102-547, eff. 1-1-22.)